Wisconsin, session 2025, SB221.
do enact as follows:SB221,11Section 1. 23.33 (1) (gm) of the statutes is created to read:SB221,2,5223.33 (1) (gm) “Hybrid trail” means an all-terrain vehicle trail and all-terrain 3vehicle route combination that allows all-terrain vehicles and motor vehicles to use 4the same linear surface and the combination is used to connect one all-terrain 5vehicle trail to another all-terrain vehicle trail or services.SB221,26Section 2. 23.33 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB221,2,13723.33 (2) (bm) Vehicles registered out-of-state. 1. A vehicle registered outside 8of this state that meets the definition of an all-terrain vehicle under sub. (1) (b) or a 9utility terrain vehicle under sub. (1) (ng) shall be considered an all-terrain vehicle 10or utility terrain vehicle, regardless of the vehicle type specified on the out-of-state 11registration for the vehicle, and shall be subject to the requirements of this section 12and chs. 340 to 351 that are applicable to all-terrain vehicles or utility terrain 13vehicles.SB221,2,18142. A vehicle registered outside of this state that does not meet the definition of 15an all-terrain vehicle under sub. (1) (b) or a utility terrain vehicle under sub. (1) (ng) 16is not an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle for purposes of this section and 17chs. 340 to 351 and the owner or operator of the vehicle may not be issued a 18nonresident trail pass under sub. (2j) for the vehicle.SB221,319Section 3. 23.33 (2j) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB221,2,232023.33 (2j) (a) 1. “Public all-terrain vehicle corridor” means an all-terrain 21vehicle trail, all-terrain vehicle route, hybrid trail, or other established all-terrain 22vehicle corridor that is open to the public but does not include an all-terrain vehicle 23route.SB221,424Section 4. 340.01 (73e) of the statutes is created to read:SB221,3,21340.01 (73e) “Utility terrain vehicle” has the meaning given in s. 23.33 (1) 2(ng).SB221,53Section 5. 340.01 (74) of the statutes is amended to read:SB221,3,94340.01 (74) “Vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or 5property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, except railroad trains. 6A snowmobile, an all-terrain vehicle, a utility terrain vehicle, a personal delivery 7device, an electric scooter, and an electric personal assistive mobility device shall 8not be considered a vehicle except for purposes made specifically applicable by 9statute.SB221,3,1010